Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1093.
do enact as follows:SB1093,13Section 1. 36.11 (16) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1093,2,2436.11 (16) Commencement of fall semester. The board shall ensure that 5no fall semester classes at any institution, except medical school classes, graduate 1health science classes, and 4th year classes at the school of veterinary medicine, 2commence until after September 1.SB1093,2,33